Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-305
Zoning regulations; comprehensive zoning ordinance.

In the event that a political subdivision has adopted or hereafter adopts a comprehensive zoning ordinance regulating, among other things, the height of buildings, any airport zoning regulations applicable to the same area or portion thereof may be incorporated in and made a part of such comprehensive zoning regulations and be administered and enforced in connection therewith.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 4(1), p. 684.